Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) If the board of county  commissioners of a county finds that a segment
of county road within the county  demonstrates a safety concern, the board may designate
that segment as a safety corridor. The board of county commissioners  for each county may
designate no more than  two safety corridors at one time. This section applies only to county
roads for which the county is the road authority.
(2) A safety corridor designated under subsection (1) of this  section must satisfy the
criteria established by the board. Before designating a safety corridor the board shall:
(a) Establish objective criteria for designating a segment of  highway as a safety corridor
under this section; and
(b) Establish requirements for regular community engagement, heightened enforcement,
engineering improvements, infrastructure investments and public outreach.
(3) Counties shall post signs in  safety corridors designated by the board indicating that
fines for traffic offenses committed in the safety corridor will be doubled.
(4)(a) The presumptive fine for a person charged with an offense that is listed in  para-
graph (d)(A) or (B) of  this subsection and that is committed in a safety corridor designated
by the board under this section shall be the amount established under ORS 153.020.
(b) The minimum fine for  a person convicted of a misdemeanor offense that is listed in
paragraph (d)(C) to (G) of this subsection and that is committed  in a safety corridor desig-
nated by the  board under this section is 20 percent of the maximum fine established for the
offense.
(c) The minimum fine for a person convicted of  a felony offense that is listed in para-
graph (d)(C) to (G) of this subsection and that is committed in a safety corridor designated
by the board under this section is two percent of the  maximum fine established for the of-
fense.
(d) This subsection applies to the following offenses if committed  in the designated safety
corridors:
(A) Class A or Class B traffic violations.
(B) Class C or Class D traffic violations related to exceeding a legal speed.
(C) Reckless driving, as defined in ORS 811.140.
Enrolled House Bill 2154 (HB 2154-A) Page 1
(D) Driving while under the influence of intoxicants, as defined in ORS 813.010.
(E) Failure to perform the duties of  a driver involved in a collision, as described in ORS
811.700 or 811.705.
(F) Criminal driving while suspended or revoked, as defined in ORS 811.182.
(G) Fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer, as defined in ORS 811.540.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 153.020 is amended to read:
153.020. (1)  If a person is charged with a traffic violation, as defined in ORS 801.557, and the
enforcement officer issuing the citation notes on the citation that the offense occurred in a  highway
work zone and is  subject to the provisions of ORS 811.230, occurred in a posted school zone and is
subject to the  provisions of ORS 811.235, or occurred in a safety corridor and is subject to the
provisions of ORS  811.483 or section 2, chapter 501, Oregon Laws 2019 , or section 2 of this 2025
Act, the presumptive fine for the violation is:
(a) $875 for a Class A violation.
(b) $525 for a Class B violation.
(c) $325 for a Class C violation.
(d) $225 for a Class D violation.
(2) Any surcharge imposed under ORS 1.188 shall be added to and made a part of  the
presumptive fine.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 153.020, as amended by section 4, chapter 501, Oregon Laws  2019, is amended
to read:
153.020. (1) If a person is charged with a traffic violation, as defined in ORS 801.557, and  the
enforcement officer issuing the citation notes on the citation that the offense occurred in a  highway
work zone and is subject to the provisions of ORS 811.230, occurred in a posted school  zone and is
subject to the provisions of ORS 811.235, or occurred in a safety corridor and is subject  to the
provisions of ORS 811.483 or section 2 of this 2025 Act , the presumptive fine for the violation is:
(a) $875 for a Class A violation.
(b) $525 for a Class B violation.
(c) $325 for a Class C violation.
(d) $225 for a Class D violation.
(2) Any surcharge imposed under ORS 1.188 shall be added to and made a part of  the
presumptive fine.
SECTION 5.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to  ORS 153.020 by sections
3 and 4 of this 2025 Act apply  to offenses committed on or after the effective date of this 2025
Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2154 (HB 2154-A) Page 2
Passed by House March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2154 (HB 2154-A) Page 3